Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,278.01
Mobile food establishment; political subdivision; local licensing reciprocity; report.

(1) A political subdivision acting as a regulatory authority may enter into an agreement under the Interlocal Cooperation Act with other public agencies to grant and provide reciprocity for local licensing of mobile food establishments for purposes of regulating food safety and handling.

(2) On or before December 1, 2023, a political subdivision acting as a regulatory authority that is eligible to participate in an agreement under this section shall submit a report electronically to the Legislature. Such report shall contain the following information:

(a) A description of any reciprocity agreement entered into pursuant to this section; or

(b) If a reciprocity agreement has not been entered into pursuant to this section, a summary of actions taken to develop such an agreement and a description of any impediments to such an agreement.

Laws 2023, LB562, § 27.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.